Vermont, session 2025-2026, H378.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Housing Infrastructure Tax Increment Financing
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 2 of 18
§ 1906. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Brownfield” means a property on which the presence or potential
presence of a hazardous substance, pollutant, or contaminant complicates the
expansion, development, redevelopment, or reuse of the property.
(2) “Committed” means pledged and appropriated for the purpose of the
current and future payment of financing and related costs.
(3) “Developer” means the person undertaking to develop a housing
infrastructure project.
(4) “Financing” means debt, including principal, interest, and any fees
or charges directly related to that debt, incurred by a sponsor to pay for a
housing infrastructure project and, in the case of a sponsor that is a
municipality, authorized by the municipality pursuant to section 1910 of this
subchapter.
(5) “Housing development site” means the parcel or parcels
encompassing a housing infrastructure project authorized by a municipality
pursuant to section 1907 of this subchapter.
(6) “Housing infrastructure project” means an improvement or
improvements authorized by a municipality pursuant to section 1907 of this
subchapter.
(7) “Improvements” means:
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 3 of 18
(A) the installation or construction of infrastructure, including
utilities, transportation, public facilities and amenities, land and property
acquisition and demolition, brownfield remediation, site preparation, and flood
remediation and mitigation; and
(B) the funding of debt service interest payments for a period of up to
three years, beginning on the date on which the first debt is incurred.
(8) “Legislative body” means the mayor and alderboard, the city
council, the selectboard, and the president and trustees of an incorporated
village, as appropriate.
(9) “Municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated village.
(10) “Original taxable value” means the total valuation as determined in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of a housing development site as of its
creation date.
(11) “Public infrastructure agreement” means a legally binding
agreement to develop a housing infrastructure project between a municipality
and a sponsor or developer, or both.
(12) “Related costs” means expenses incurred and paid by a
municipality, exclusive of the actual cost of constructing and financing a
housing infrastructure project, that are directly related to the creation and
implementation of the municipality’s housing infrastructure project, including
reimbursement of sums previously advanced by the municipality for those
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 4 of 18
purposes. Related costs may not include direct municipal expenses such as
departmental or personnel costs.
(13) “Sponsor” means the person undertaking to finance a housing
infrastructure project. Any of a municipality, a developer, or an independent
agency that meets State lending standards may serve as a sponsor for a housing
infrastructure project.
§ 1907. CREATION OF HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT AND
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT SITE
(a) The legislative body of a municipality may create within its jurisdiction
a housing infrastructure project, which shall consist of improvements that
stimulate the development of housing, and a housing development site, which
shall consist of the parcel or parcels on which a housing infrastructure project
is installed or constructed.
(b) To create a housing infrastructure project and housing development
site, a municipality shall:
(1) develop a housing development plan, including:
(A) a description of the proposed housing infrastructure project and
the proposed housing development site;
(B) identification of a sponsor;
(C) a development financing plan;
(D) a pro forma projection of expected costs;
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 5 of 18
(E) a projection of revenues; and
(F) a development schedule that includes a list, a cost estimate, and a
schedule for the proposed housing infrastructure project and projected private
development to occur as a result of the proposed housing infrastructure project;
(2) develop a plan describing the housing development site by its
boundaries and the properties therein, entitled “Proposed Housing
Development Site (municipal name), Vermont”;
(3) hold one or more public hearings, after public notice, on the
proposed housing infrastructure project, including the plans developed
pursuant to this subsection; and
(4) adopt by act of the legislative body of the municipality the plan
developed under subdivision (2) of this subsection, which shall be recorded
with the municipal clerk and lister or assessor.
(c) The creation of a housing development site shall occur at 12:01 a.m. on
April 1 of the calendar year in which the Vermont Economic Progress Council
approves the use of tax increment financing for the housing infrastructure
project pursuant to section 1909 of this subchapter.
§ 1908. PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE AGREEMENT
(a) The public infrastructure agreement for a housing infrastructure project
shall:
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 6 of 18
(1) clearly identify the developer and sponsor for the housing
infrastructure project;
(2) clearly identify the housing development projected for the housing
development site and identify the substantial completion target for certification
pursuant to subsection 1910b(d);
(3) obligate the tax increments retained pursuant to section 1910b of this
subchapter for not more than the financing and related costs for the housing
infrastructure project;
(4) provide as consideration offered by the municipality not more than
the tax increments retained pursuant to section 1910b of this subchapter; and
(5) ensure the municipality pursuing the housing infrastructure project is
protected against developer or sponsor failure to perform.
(b) A municipality shall provide notice of the terms of the public
infrastructure agreement governing the municipality’s housing infrastructure
project to the legal voters of the municipality and shall provide the same
information as set forth in subsection 1910(e) of this subchapter.
§ 1909. HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT APPLICATION;
VERMONT ECONOMIC PROGRESS COUNCIL
(a) A municipality, upon approval of its legislative body, may apply to the
Vermont Economic Progress Council to use tax increment financing for a
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 7 of 18
housing infrastructure project. The Vermont Economic Progress Council may
approve only applications meeting the standards of this section.
(b) Staff of the Council may approve applications submitted to meet either
location criterion of subdivisions (d)(2)(A)–(B) of this section, but applications
submitted to meet either location criterion of subdivisions (d)(2)(C)–(D) of this
section shall require approval of the board.
(c) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
housing infrastructure project application to determine whether the
municipality has:
(1) created a housing infrastructure project and housing development
site pursuant to subsection 1907(b) of this subchapter;
(2) executed a public infrastructure agreement to develop the housing
infrastructure project with a sponsor or developer, or both, adhering to the
standards of subsection 1908(a) of this subchapter; and
(3) approved or pledged to use incremental municipal tax revenues for
the housing infrastructure project in the proportion provided in subsection
1910b(b) of this subchapter.
(d) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
housing infrastructure project application to determine whether the housing
development plan meets the following criteria:
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 8 of 18
(1) at least 50 percent of the gross floor area of the projected private
development is dedicated to housing; and
(2) the housing development site is located within one of the following
areas:
(A) an area designated Tier 1 pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 151;
(B) an area exempt from the provisions of 10 V.S.A. chapter 151
pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 6081(dd);
(C) an existing settlement as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A.
§ 6001(16); or
(D) an area within one half-mile of an existing settlement as that term
is defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001(16).
(e) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall approve a
municipality’s tax increment financing plan prior to a sponsor’s incurrence of
debt for the housing infrastructure project, including, if the sponsor is a
municipality, prior to a public vote to pledge the credit of the municipality
under section 1910 of this subchapter. The tax increment financing plan shall
include all information related to the proposed financing necessary for
approval by the Council and to ensure its viability and consistency with the
housing development plan developed pursuant to subdivision 1907(b)(1) of
this subchapter.
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 9 of 18
§ 1910. INDEBTEDNESS
(a) A municipality approved for tax increment financing under section
1909 of this subchapter may incur indebtedness against revenues of the
housing development site at any time during a period of up to two years
following the creation of the housing development site. If no debt is incurred
for the housing infrastructure project during this two-year period, whether by
the municipality or sponsor, the housing development site shall terminate.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of any municipal charter, each instance
of borrowing by the municipality to finance or otherwise pay for a housing
infrastructure project shall occur only after the legal voters of the municipality,
by a majority vote of all voters present and voting on the question at a special
or annual municipal meeting duly warned for the purpose, authorize the
legislative body to pledge the credit of the municipality, borrow, or otherwise
secure the debt for the specific purposes so warned.
(c) Any indebtedness incurred under this section may be retired over any
period authorized by the legislative body of the municipality.
(d) The housing development site shall continue until the date and hour the
indebtedness is retired or, if no debt is incurred, two years following the
creation of the housing development site.
(e) A municipal legislative body shall provide information to the public
prior to the public vote required under subsection (b) of this section. This
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 10 of 18
information shall include the amount and types of debt and related costs to be
incurred, including principal, interest, and fees; terms of the debt; the housing
infrastructure project to be financed; the private development projected to
occur because of the housing infrastructure project; and notice to the voters
that if the tax increment received by the municipality from any property tax
source is insufficient to pay the principal and interest on the debt in any year,
the municipality shall remain liable for the full payment of the principal and
interest for the term of the indebtedness. If interfund loans within the
municipality are used, the information must also include documentation of the
terms and conditions of the loan. If interfund loans within the municipality are
used as the method of financing, no interest shall be charged.
§ 1910a. ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE; TAX INCREMENT
(a) As of the date the housing development site is created, the lister or
assessor for the municipality shall certify the original taxable value and shall
certify to the legislative body in each year thereafter during the life of the
housing development site the amount by which the total valuation as
determined in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real
property within the housing development site has increased or decreased
relative to the original taxable value.
(b) Throughout the life of the housing development site, the lister or
assessor shall include not more than the original taxable value of the real
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 11 of 18
property in the assessed valuation upon which the treasurer computes the rates
of all taxes levied by the municipality and every other taxing district in which
the housing development site is situated, but the treasurer shall extend all rates
so determined against the entire assessed valuation of real property for that
year.
(c) Throughout the life of the housing development site, a municipality
shall remit not less than the aggregate tax due on the original taxable value to
the Education Fund.
(d) Throughout the life of the housing development site, the municipality
shall hold apart, rather than remit to the taxing districts, that proportion of all
taxes paid that year on the real property within the housing development site
that the excess valuation bears to the total assessed valuation. The amount
held apart each year is the “tax increment” for that year. The tax increment
shall only be used for financing and related costs.
(e) Not more than the percentages established pursuant to section 1910b of
this subchapter of the municipal and State education tax increments received
with respect to the housing development site and committed for the payment
for financing for improvements and related costs shall be segregated by the
municipality in a special tax increment financing account and in its official
books and records until all capital indebtedness incurred for the housing
infrastructure project has been fully paid. The final payment shall be reported
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 12 of 18
to the treasurer, who shall thereafter include the entire assessed valuation of the
housing development site in the assessed valuations upon which the municipal
and other tax rates are computed and extended, and thereafter no taxes from
the housing development site shall be deposited in the special tax increment
financing account.
(f) Notwithstanding any charter provision or other provision, all property
taxes assessed within a housing development site shall be subject to the
provisions of this section. Special assessments levied under chapter 76A or 87
of this title or under a municipal charter shall not be considered property taxes
for the purpose of this section if the proceeds are used exclusively for
operating expenses related to properties within the housing development site
and not for the housing infrastructure project.
§ 1910b. USE OF TAX INCREMENT; RETENTION PERIOD;
SUBSTANTIAL COMPLETION
(a) Education property tax increment. For only debt incurred within the
period permitted under subsection 1910(a) of this subchapter and related costs,
up to 80 percent of the education property tax increment may be retained for
up to 20 years, beginning on July 1 of the year in which the Vermont
Economic Progress Council certifies substantial completion of the housing
development pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 13 of 18
(b) Municipal property tax increment. For only debt incurred within the
period permitted under subsection 1910(a) of this subchapter and related costs,
not less than 80 percent of the municipal property tax increment may be
retained, beginning on July 1 of the year in which the Vermont Economic
Progress Council certifies substantial completion of the housing development
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(c) Excess tax increment.
(1) Of the municipal and education property tax increments received in
any tax year that exceed the amounts committed for the payment of the
financing and related costs for a housing infrastructure project, equal portions
of each increment may be retained for the following purposes:
(A) to prepay principal and interest on the financing;
(B) to place in a special tax increment financing account required
pursuant to subsection 1910a(e) of this subchapter and use for future financing
payments; or
(C) to use for defeasance of the financing.
(2) Any remaining portion of the excess education property tax
increment shall be distributed to the Education Fund. Any remaining portion
of the excess municipal property tax increment shall be distributed to the city,
town, or village budget in the proportion that each budget bears to the
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 14 of 18
combined total of the budgets unless otherwise negotiated by the city, town, or
village.
(d) Substantial completion certification. A municipality shall promptly
notify the Vermont Economic Progress Council upon completion of 50 percent
of the housing development projected in the housing development plan
developed pursuant to subdivision 1907(b)(1). The Vermont Economic
Progress Council shall confirm and certify substantial completion of the
housing development against the housing development plan for the purpose of
starting the tax increment retention periods pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)
of this section.
§ 1910c. INFORMATION REPORTING
(a) A municipality with an active housing infrastructure project shall:
(1) develop a system, segregated for the housing infrastructure project,
to identify, collect, and maintain all data and information necessary to fulfill
the reporting requirements of this section, including performance measures;
(2) provide timely notification to the Department of Taxes and the
Vermont Economic Progress Council of any housing infrastructure project
debt, public vote, or vote by the municipal legislative body immediately
following the debt incurrence or public vote on a form prescribed by the
Council, including copies of public notices, agendas, minutes, vote tally, and a
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 15 of 18
copy of the information provided to the public pursuant to subsection 1910(e)
of this subchapter; and
(3) annually on or before October 15, submit on a form prescribed by
the Vermont Economic Progress Council an annual report to the Council and
the Department of Taxes, including the information required by subdivision (2)
of this subsection if not previously submitted, the information required for
annual audit under section 1910d of this subchapter, and any information
required by the Council or the Department of Taxes for the report required
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Annually on or before January 1, the Vermont Economic Progress
Council and the Department of Taxes shall submit a report to the Senate
Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on
Finance and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development
and on Ways and Means on housing infrastructure projects approved pursuant
to this subchapter, including for each:
(1) the date of approval;
(2) a description of the housing infrastructure project;
(3) the original taxable value of the housing development site;
(4) the scope and value of projected and actual improvements and
developments in the housing development site;
(5) projected and actual incremental revenue amounts;
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 16 of 18
(6) the allocation of incremental revenue;
(7) projected and actual financing;
(8) performance measures developed by the Vermont Economic
Progress Council; and
(9) the amount of infrastructure work performed by Vermont firms.
§ 1910d. AUDITING
Annually on or before April 1 until the year following the end of the period
for retention of education property tax increment, a municipality with a
housing infrastructure project approved under this subchapter shall ensure that
the housing infrastructure project is subject to the annual audit prescribed in
section 1681 or 1690 of this title and submit a copy to the Vermont Economic
Progress Council. If a housing infrastructure project is subject only to the
audit under section 1681 of this title, the Council shall ensure a process is in
place to subject the housing infrastructure project to an independent audit.
Procedures for the audit must include verification of the original taxable value
and annual and total municipal and education property tax increments
generated, expenditures for financing and related costs, and current balance.
§ 1910e. GUIDANCE
(a) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development, after
reasonable notice to a municipality and an opportunity for a hearing, may issue
decisions to a municipality on questions and inquiries concerning the
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 17 of 18
administration of housing infrastructure projects, statutes, rules,
noncompliance with this subchapter, and any instances of noncompliance
identified in audit reports conducted pursuant to section 1910d of this
subchapter.
(b) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall prepare
recommendations for the Secretary of Commerce and Community
Development prior to any decision issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section. The Council may prepare recommendations in consultation with the
Commissioner of Taxes, the Attorney General, and the State Treasurer. In
preparing recommendations, the Council shall provide a municipality with a
reasonable opportunity to submit written information in support of its position.
(c) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development shall review
the recommendations of the Council and issue a final written decision on each
matter within 60 days following receipt of the recommendations. The
Secretary may permit an appeal to be taken by any party to a Superior Court
for determination of questions of law in the same manner as the Supreme Court
may by rule provide for appeals before final judgment from a Superior Court
before issuing a final decision.
(d) The Vermont Economic Progress Council may adopt policies that are
consistent with the 2015 TIF Rule, as modified by subsequent rulemaking, to
implement this subchapter.
VT LEG #381015 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.378
2025 Page 18 of 18
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3325 is amended to read:
§ 3325. VERMONT ECONOMIC PROGRESS COUNCIL
(a) Creation. The Vermont Economic Progress Council is created to
exercise the authority and perform the duties assigned to it, including its
authority and duties relating to:
(1) the Vermont Employment Growth Incentive Program pursuant to
subchapter 2 of this chapter; and
(2) tax increment financing districts pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 53,
subchapter 5 and section 5404a of this title; and
(3) housing infrastructure tax increment financing pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
chapter 53, subchapter 7.
* * *
(g) Decisions not subject to review. A decision of the Council to approve
or deny an application under subchapter 2 of this chapter, or to approve or
deny a tax increment financing district pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 53,
subchapter 5 and section 5404a of this title, or to approve or deny a housing
infrastructure project pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 7 is an
administrative decision that is not subject to the contested case hearing
requirements under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 and is not subject to judicial review.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381015 v.3